Louisiana, session 2026, HB65.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:343(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§343. Preventing sexual harassment; mandatory training requirements
A.(1)(a) Each public servant employee shall receive a minimum of one hour
of education and training on preventing sexual harassment during each full calendar
year of his public employment or term of office, as the case may be.
(b) Each elected official shall receive a minimum of one hour of education
and training on preventing sexual harassment during his term of office.
* * *